Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202048-2609
Registration and renewal fees.

(1) An application for registration or renewal of registration must be accompanied by either an application for registration fee or a renewal of registration fee, as applicable.

(2) The Secretary of State may, by rule and regulation, establish fees for applications for registration and renewals of registration at rates sufficient to cover the costs of administering the Nebraska Uniform Athlete Agents Act, in the event any such fees are required. Such fees shall be collected by the Secretary of State and remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Secretary of State Cash Fund.

Laws 2009, LB292, § 9;

Laws 2020, LB910, § 17.
July 1, 2021